Wisconsin, session 2025, SB975.
do enact as follows:SB975,11Section 1. 217.12 of the statutes is created to read:SB975,2,22217.12 Virtual currency kiosks. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB975,2,63(a) “Automated teller machine” has the meaning given in s. 134.85 (1) (a) and 4includes customer bank communications terminals under s. 221.0303, remote 5service units under ss. 214.04 (21) and 215.13 (46), and remote terminals under s. 6186.113 (15).SB975,3,21(b) “Fiat currency” means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted 2by the federal government as part of its currency and is not backed by a commodity.SB975,3,33(c) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given in s. 165.83 (1) (b).SB975,3,54(d) “Transaction” means a transaction conducted by means of a virtual 5currency kiosk.SB975,3,66(e) “Virtual currency” has the meaning given in s. 177.01 (16).SB975,3,107(f) “Virtual currency kiosk" means an electronic terminal or retail location, in 8this state, from which a person may exchange fiat currency for virtual currency or 9virtual currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency, including by connecting 10to a separate virtual currency exchange.SB975,3,1211(g) “Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a person engaged in the business 12of operating virtual currency kiosks in this state.SB975,3,1513(2) License required. No person may engage in the business of operating 14virtual currency kiosks in this state unless the person is licensed under this 15chapter.SB975,3,1816(3) Warning. (a) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall affix to the front of 17each virtual currency kiosk, within the customer’s field of vision, the following 18printed warning, capitalized and underlined as indicated:SB975,4,219“FRAUD ALERT! Criminals seek to defraud virtual currency customers by 20impersonating loved ones, government officials, law enforcement officers, or 21charities; threatening jail time; stating that your identity was stolen or your 22accounts frozen; or claiming your computer was hacked. IF SOMEONE YOU 23DON’T KNOW IS ASKING YOU TO SEND VIRTUAL CURRENCY FROM THIS 24MACHINE, DO NOT PROCEED WITH THE TRANSACTION. LOSSES DUE TO 1FRAUDULENT OR ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS MAY NOT BE 2RECOVERABLE.SB975,4,33NOTICE: Virtual currency may be traded for free in online exchanges.”SB975,4,84(b) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall ensure that, as part of each virtual 5currency kiosk transaction, the warning under par. (a) is also displayed 6electronically on the virtual currency kiosk screen before any other disclosure 7appears on the screen and that the customer affirmatively acknowledges the 8warning before the customer may proceed with the transaction.SB975,4,109(c) The warning affixed to the front of a virtual currency kiosk under par. (a) 10shall be printed in type size no smaller than 20 point.SB975,4,1311(4) Customer identification. (a) Collection of information. Before entering 12into an initial transaction with an individual, a virtual currency kiosk operator 13shall verify the individual’s identity by doing all of the following:SB975,4,14141. Collecting all of the following information pertaining to the individual:SB975,4,1515a. Full legal name.SB975,4,1616b. Date of birth.SB975,4,1717c. Telephone number.SB975,4,1818d. Residence address.SB975,4,1919e. Email address.SB975,4,21202. Obtaining a copy of the individual’s driver’s license, passport, or other 21government-issued identification document that identifies the individual.SB975,4,2322(b) Identity verification for each transaction. In each transaction with a 23customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall do all of the following:SB975,5,211. Verify the customer’s identity before accepting payment from or dispensing 2funds to the customer.SB975,5,432. Take a photograph of the customer in a retainable format at the virtual 4currency kiosk.SB975,5,75(c) False or multiple identities. 1. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not 6complete a transaction with a customer unless the virtual currency kiosk operator 7has verified the customer’s identity as provided in par. (b) 1.SB975,5,1182. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not allow a customer to engage in a 9transaction under any name or identity other than the customer's own true name 10and identity, or under any account other than an account associated with the 11customer’s true name and identity.SB975,5,1612(5) Virtual currency kiosk location. (a) Notice. A virtual currency kiosk 13operator shall provide notice of the location of each virtual currency kiosk to a law 14enforcement agency having territorial jurisdiction at that location. The virtual 15currency kiosk operator shall provide this notice before entering into its first 16transaction with an individual at that location.SB975,5,1917(b) Automated teller machines. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not 18locate a virtual currency kiosk within 5 feet of, or operate a virtual currency kiosk 19that also functions as, an automated teller machine. SB975,5,2320(6) Transaction restrictions and refunds. (a) Daily transaction limit. A 21virtual currency kiosk operator may not accept from or dispense to a customer, by 22means of any virtual currency kiosk, more than a total of $500 in fiat currency in 23the same day.SB975,6,524(b) Fee limit. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not collect fees or other 1charges from a customer in connection with a transaction that exceed the greater of 2$5 or 3 percent of the transaction amount. For purposes of this paragraph, “fees or 3other charges” includes any difference between the price charged to a customer to 4buy, sell, exchange, or convert virtual currency and the prevailing market value of 5the virtual currency at the time of the transaction.SB975,6,126(c) Refund in certain circumstances. Upon request of a customer, a virtual 7currency kiosk operator shall issue a refund to the customer for the full amount of 8any transaction, including any fees charged in association with the transaction, if, 9not later than 30 days after the transaction, the customer contacted the virtual 10currency kiosk operator and the department of justice, the department of financial 11institutions, or a law enforcement agency to inform them of the fraudulent nature of 12the transaction.SB975,6,1713(7) Operational requirements; fraud prevention. (a) Customer service. 14A virtual currency kiosk operator shall provide live customer service through a toll-15free telephone number during all hours in which any of its virtual currency kiosks 16is operable. The virtual currency kiosk operator shall display this telephone 17number on the exterior or a screen of each virtual currency kiosk.SB975,6,2018(b) Receipts. Upon completion of a transaction, a virtual currency kiosk 19operator shall provide to the customer a physical and electronic receipt containing 20all of the following information:SB975,6,23211. The name and contact information of the virtual currency kiosk operator, 22including a telephone number established by the virtual currency kiosk operator to 23answer questions and register complaints.SB975,7,212. Identification of relevant state law enforcement agencies and government 2agencies for reporting fraud.SB975,7,433. The type, value, date, and precise time of the transaction, along with the 4transaction hash and each applicable electronic record address.SB975,7,654. The name and contact information of both the sender and the designated 6recipient of the transaction.SB975,7,775. All fees charged. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb975 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb975 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB975 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB975 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB975: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting